Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-185
Professional service; filing required; certificate of registration; contents.

(1) Each member, manager, professional employee, or agent of a limited liability company who renders a professional service shall hold a valid license or otherwise be duly authorized to render that professional service under the law of this state if such member, manager, professional employee, or agent renders a professional service within this state or under the law of the state or other jurisdiction in which such person renders the professional service.

(2) Before rendering a professional service, a limited liability company shall (a)(i) deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of registration issued to the limited liability company by the regulatory body of the particular profession for which the limited liability company is organized to do business, which certificate sets forth the name and address of every member, manager, professional employee, and agent of the limited liability company who is required by law to be licensed or otherwise authorized to render the professional service for which the limited liability company is organized to do business or a service ancillary to those which the limited liability company renders as of the last day of the month preceding the date of delivery of the certificate, and (ii) certify that all of those members, managers, professional employees, and agents of the limited liability company who are required by law to do so are duly licensed or otherwise authorized to render the professional service for which the limited liability company is organized to do business or a service ancillary to those which the limited liability company renders or (b) comply with and qualify under the procedures set forth in subsection (2) of section 21-186.

(3) The registration certificate requirements of this section and sections 21-186 to 21-188 shall apply to both limited liability companies and foreign limited liability companies.

(4) Any limited liability company that, prior to July 19, 2024, has a certificate of registration pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of section 21-186 may continue to render professional service if the certificate of registration is maintained continuously on and after July 19, 2024.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 85;

Laws 2024, LB628, § 2.